District of Columbia statutes.
32-102

Transition employment period.

(a)

The present contractor within a period of 10 days after the awarding of a contract shall make available to prospective contractors the names of all employees of the present contractor employed at the site or sites covered by the prospective contract, the date each employee was hired, and the employee’s occupation classification.

(b)

A new contractor who is awarded a contract to provide similar covered services provided by the previous contractor shall retain, for a 90-day transition employment period, covered employees who have been employed by the previous contractor for the preceding 8 months or longer at the site or sites covered by the contract.

(c)

If at any time, the new contractor determines that fewer employees are required to perform the new contract than were required by the previous contractor, the new contractor shall retain employees by seniority within job classification.

(d)

During the 90-day transition employment period, the new contractor shall maintain a preferential hiring list of eligible covered employees not retained by the new contractor from which the new contractor may hire additional employees.

(e)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the new contractor shall not discharge an employee retained pursuant to this chapter during the 90-day transition period without cause.

(f)

At the end of the 90-day transition employment period, the new contractor shall perform a written performance evaluation for each employee retained pursuant to this chapter. If the employee’s performance during the 90-day transition employment period is satisfactory, the new contractor shall offer the employee continued employment under the terms and conditions established by the new contractor.

(g)

If a contractor’s contract at an establishment in the District of Columbia is not renewed, and within 30 days the contractor is awarded a similar contract at another establishment in the District of Columbia, the contractor shall retain at least 50% of the employees from each establishment as needed to perform the contract.

History

Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-105, § 3, 41 DCR 1011
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 43, 43 DCR 530

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1502.